Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 1

General Provisions [Repealed]

44-10-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101 —44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 — 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 — 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 — 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.

44-10-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§44-10-101-44-10-109 (Acts 1899, ch. 18, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1903, ch. 61, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2848a1, 2848a2, 6888a43, 6888a44, 6888a45; mod. Code 1932, §§ 5076, 5077, 11400, 11401; Acts 1939, ch. 117, §§ 1-4; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6579.19 - 6579.22 (Williams, §§ 6579.21 - 6529.24); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-1901 - 44-1909; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning general provisions for dealers and purchasers of poultry, livestock and hides, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 1, effective June 30, 2010.